Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.370

Park district containing city with population over one hundred thousand—May commission police officers.

A metropolitan park district which contains a city with a population greater than one hundred thousand may commission its own police officers with full police powers to enforce the laws and regulations of the city or county on metropolitan park district property. Police officers initially employed after June 30, 1989, pursuant to this section shall be required to successfully complete basic law enforcement training in accordance with chapter 43.101 RCW.

[ 1989 c 319 s 5.]